Utah statutes.
63M-7-507.   Director -- Appointment and functions.

The executive director of the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, after consulting with the board, shall appoint a director to carry out the provisions of this chapter.  The director shall be an experienced administrator with a background in at least one of the following fields: social work, psychology, criminal justice, law, or a related field.  The director shall demonstrate an understanding of the needs of crime victims and of services to victims.  The director shall devote the director's time and capacity to the director's duties.  The director shall:

(1)  hire staff, including reparations officers, as necessary;

(2)  act when necessary as a reparations officer in deciding initial claims;

(3)  possess the same investigation and decision-making authority as the reparations officers;

(4)  hear appeals from the decisions of the reparations officers, unless the director acted as a reparations officer on the initial claim;

(5)  serve as a liaison between the Office of Crime Victim Reparations and the board;

(6)  serve as the public relations representative of the office;

(7)  provide for payment of all administrative salaries, fees, and expenses incurred by the staff of the board, to be paid out of appropriations from the fund;

(8)  cooperate with the state treasurer and the state Division of Finance in causing the funds in the trust fund to be invested and its investments sold or exchanged and the proceeds and income collected;

(9)  apply for, receive, allocate, disburse, and account for grants of funds made available by the United States, the state, foundations, corporations, and other businesses, agencies, or individuals;

(10)  obtain and utilize the services of other governmental agencies upon request; and

(11)  act in any other capacity or perform any other acts necessary for the office or board to successfully fulfill its statutory objectives.

